Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.200

Director—Authority to adopt rules.

The director shall adopt rules for the purpose of carrying out and developing this chapter, including rules governing the conduct of inspections.

[ 2002 c 86 s 211; 1986 c 324 s 16; 1982 c 205 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.